Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-543
School board member; qualifications.

No person shall file for office, be nominated or elected, or serve as a member of a school board in any class of school district unless he or she is a legal voter in such district.

Laws 1971, LB 420, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-439.01;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 595;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-443.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 296;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 21.

Election and terms of office, see sections 32-541 to 32-546.

Learning community coordinating council members, election, terms, and vacancies, see section 32-546.01.